District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-1017

Old Naval Hospital Foundation grant authority.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1806l
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1211, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226

Temporary Addition of Section

Section 2 of D.C. Law 17-264 added a section to read as follows: “Sec. 1806k. Old Naval Hospital Foundation grant authority. Subject to appropriations, the Office of Property Management is authorized to make a grant in the amount of up to $5.5 million to the Old Naval Hospital Foundation for the purposes of renovating and making improvements to the Old Naval Hospital, Carriage House, and adjacent grounds, located at 921 Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E., in accordance with plans and specifications approved by the Office of Property Management and pursuant to a grant agreement between the District and the Old Naval Hospital Foundation.”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 17-264 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Old Naval Hospital Grant Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-462, July 28, 2008, 55 DCR 8734).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Old Naval Hospital Grant Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-543, October 20, 2008, 55 DCR 11428).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1211 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1211 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).

Short Title

Short title: Section 1210 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle V of title I of the act may be cited as the “Old Naval Hospital Grant Amendment Act of 2009”.

Editor's Notes

Section 69 of D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction to this section as it existed prior to its repeal.